Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202154-176
Brand inspector, defined.

Brand inspector means a person employed by the Nebraska Brand Committee, or some other brand inspection agency, inside or outside of the State of Nebraska, for the purpose of identifying brands, marks, or other identifying characteristics of livestock or approved nonvisual identifiers to determine the existence of such brands, marks, or identifying characteristics or identifiers and from such determinations attempt to establish correct and true ownership of such livestock, and generally carry out the provisions and enforcement of all laws pertaining to brands, brand inspection, physical inspection, electronic inspection, and associated livestock laws.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 7;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 12.
August 28, 2021